hu: Kornettfúvóka/-szár típusa: Kornett (rövid) szár; Nagy szár; Trombita/kornett (szabványos) szár; Egyéb
sl-SI: Vrsta stebla ustnika pri kornetu: Za kornet (kratko steblo); Široko steblo; Za trobento/kornet (standardno steblo); Drugo
nb: Kornettmunnstykkes skafttype: Kornett-skaft (kort); Stort skaft; Trompet-/kornett-skaft (standard); Annet
sk-SK: Typ stopky náustku krídlovky: Kornetová (krátka) stopka; Veľká stopka; Trúbková/kornetová (štandardná) stopka; Iné
zh-TW: 短號吹嘴柄徑類型: 短號 (短) 柄; 粗柄; 小號/短號 (標準) 柄; 其他
pl: Typ czopu ustnika kornetu: Nóżka do kornetu (krótka); Szeroka nóżka; Nóżka do trąbki/kornetu (standard); Inny
nl: Kornetmondstuk schachttype: Kornet (korte) schacht; Grote schacht; Trompet/kornet (standaard) schacht; Overige
it: tipo di gambo del bocchino per cornetta: Penna per cornetta (corta); Penna larga; Penna per tromba/cornetta (standard); Altro
ro-RO: Tipul de tijă pentru muștiuc de cornet: Tijă scurtă (cornet); Tijă mare; Tijă (standard) pentru trompetă/cornet; Altele
lt-LT: Korneto kandiklio kotelio tipas: Korneto (trumpas) kaklelis; Platus kaklelis; Trimitų / kornetų (standartinis) kaklelis; Kita
el: Τύπος στελέχους επιστομίου κορνέτας: Στέλεχος κορνέτας (κοντό); Μεγάλο στέλεχος; Στέλεχος τρομπέτας/κορνέτας (τυπικό); Άλλο
th: ปากเป่าคอร์เน็ตแบบก้าน: ก้าน (สั้น) คอร์เน็ต; ก้านขนาดใหญ่; ก้าน (มาตรฐาน) ทรัมเป็ต/คอร์เน็ต; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 短号吹嘴柄类型: 短号（短）管; 大管; 小号/短号（标准）管; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta drške usnika za kornet: Kornet (kratki) usadnik; Veliki usadnik; Truba/kornet (standardni) usadnik; Ostalo
bg-BG: Тип мундщук на мундщука за корнет.: Опашка за корнет (къса); Голяма опашка; Стандартна опашка (тромпет/корнет); Други
ko: 코넷 마우스피스 샹크 타입: 코넷(숏) 섕크; 라지 섕크; 트럼펫/코넷(스탠다드) 섕크; 기타
ja: コルネット用マウスピースのシャンクタイプ: コルネット (ショート) シャンク; ラージシャンク; トランペット / コルネット (スタンダード) シャンク; その他
tr: Kornet ağızlığı şaft tipi: Kornet (kısa) sap; Geniş sap; Trompet/kornet (standart) sap; Diğer
en: Cornet mouthpiece shank type: Cornet (short) shank; Large shank; Trumpet/cornet (standard) shank; Other
fi: Kornetin suukappaleen varren tyyppi: Kornetin varsi (lyhyt); Suuri varsi; Trumpetin/kornetin varsi (vakio); Muu
ru: Тип хвостовика мундштука корнета: Корнетный (короткий) хвостовик; Широкий хвостовик; Трубный/корнетный (стандартный) хвостовик; Другое
es: Tipo de vástago de boquilla de corneta: Tudel de corneta (corto); Tudel grande; Tudel de trompeta/corneta (estándar); Otro
sv: Kornettmunstyckesskafttyp: Kornett (kort) fattning; Stort skaft; Trumpet/kornett (standard) skaft; Övrigt
de: Typ des Kornettmundstückschafts: Kornett-Schaft (kurz); Großer Schaft; Trompeten-/Kornett-Schaft (Standard); Andere
da: Type af mundstykke til kornet: Kornet (kort) skaft; Stort skaft; Trompet/kornet (standard) skaft; Andet
vi: Loại cán ống ngậm kèn cornet: Chuôi kèn Cornet (ngắn); Chuôi lớn; Chuôi kèn Trumpet/Cornet (tiêu chuẩn); Khác
pt-PT: Tipo de haste do bocal do cornetim: Haste de corneta (curta); Haste larga; Haste de trompete/corneta (padrão); Outro
pt-BR: Tipo de haste do bocal de cornetim: Haste (curta) de corneta; Haste larga; Haste (padrão) para trompete/corneta; Outros
fr: Type de queue d’embouchure de cornet: Queue de cornet (courte); Queue large; Queue de trompette/cornet (standard); Autre
cs: Typ stopky nátrubku kornetu: Kornetová (krátká) stopka; Široká stopka; Trubková/kornetová (standardní) stopka; Ostatní